Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 1 General Provisions

49-6-1.
Purpose of article.

The constantly increasing proportion of older people within the population of this state and the increasing gravity of the human distress and the loss accruing to the entire society as a result of the limitations and disadvantages confronting older people in maintaining their economic self-sufficiency and personal well-being and realizing their maximum potential as contributors to their community, state, and nation are matters of profound import and concern for all the people of this state.

It is, therefore, necessary and of the utmost importance to encourage the development and maintenance within this state of a comprehensive and coordinated network of public and private facilities for the alleviation or correction of these limitations and disadvantages and to encourage the conducting of continuous study and research into the needs and problems of older people under present and future economic and social conditions because it is essential for the prevention of dependency and the conservation of human values and a necessity in safeguarding and fostering the general welfare.

It is, therefore, declared to be the intent of the General Assembly by the passage of this article to provide for encouragement of the development, maintenance, and coordination of the aforementioned facilities.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 604, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, the subsection (a), (b), and (c) designations were added in this Code section.

49-6-2.
Department designated agency for federal programs for aging; development and coordination of state, local, and interstate programs.

The department shall constitute the designated state agency to handle all programs of the federal government relating to the aging and requiring acts within the state which are not the specific responsibility of another state agency under provisions of federal or state law. Authority is conferred upon the department to accept and disburse any funds available or which might become available pursuant to the purposes set out in this article.

The department shall study, investigate, promote, plan, and execute a program to meet the present and future needs of aging citizens of the state; and it shall receive the cooperation of all other state departments and agencies in carrying out a coordinated program.

It shall also be the duty of the department to encourage and assist in the development of programs for the aging in the counties, towns, and cities of this state. It shall consult and cooperate with public and private agencies, with county and municipal officers and agencies, and with any federal or state agency or officer for the purpose of promoting coordination between state and local plans and programs and between state and interstate plans and programs for the aging.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 604, § 9.

49-6-3.
Powers of department.

Without limiting the foregoing, the department is authorized to:

Promote the health of and medical services for the aging in working with professional associations, hospitals, and institutions;

Promote the rehabilitation of incapacitated older persons;

Establish a state-wide coordinated program with participation of employers, employee’s organizations, and state and local agencies to promote greater and more suitable employment opportunities for older persons;

Establish a program of research and education on housing of the aged by either public or private means as well as by the establishment of self-sustaining cooperative dwelling projects for aging persons;

Plan and promote recreational facilities for the aging;

Develop a program of adult education designed for older persons on subjects of particular concern to them;

Encourage the further research in the colleges and universities of the state on problems of the aging;

Encourage training of personnel to handle problems of the aging;

Promote community education in the problems of older people through institutes, publications, radio, television, and the press;

Provide consultation to communities and groups developing state-wide or local services for older people;

Provide consultation to the various departments of state government concerning matters relating to the aging;

Inquire into and make recommendations to the appropriate agencies, public or private, on any matter affecting the behavior, care, or welfare of the aging;

Enlist the aid of public and private agencies concerned with the welfare of the aging; and study and report on the functions and facilities of governmental agencies and institutions charged with the care, control, protection, and rehabilitation of the aging;

Serve as a communications clearing-house for information in the large and complex fields of human relationship in respect to aging;

Conduct or participate financially in conducting demonstration projects with counties, municipalities, or public or private agencies concerned with problems of the aging;

Do any other thing it deems necessary to promote the health and well-being of the aging citizens of this state not inconsistent with the purposes of this article or the public policies of this state; and

Appoint such committees, on a nonpay basis, as it deems necessary for carrying out the purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 604, § 10.

Cross references.

Financing of residential care facilities for the elderly, § 31-7-110 et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Nursing homes, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-8.

49-6-4.
Acceptance of federal and other grants, gifts, bequests, or devises.

The department may receive and accept on behalf of the state any grant or grant-in-aid from the federal government or any grant, gift, bequest, or devise from any other source; and title shall pass to the state unless otherwise specified by the grantor.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 604, § 11.

49-6-5.
Creation of the Division of Aging Services within department.

The Division of Aging Services, administratively established previously within the department, is statutorily established. The Division of Aging Services established by this Code section shall have those functions, duties, powers, and responsibilities heretofore assigned by the board and the commissioner and as hereafter so assigned or as provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1008, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-5/HB 228.

49-6-6.
Annual report.

It shall be the duty of the department to submit an annual report to the Governor and to notify the General Assembly of such report on or before January 1 of each year, setting forth the results of its studies, accomplishments, and recommendations, if any, for legislation. The department shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 604, § 12; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 42/SB 49.

49-6-7.
Funds for expenses.

All expenses incurred in administering and carrying this article into effect shall be paid out of funds appropriated by the General Assembly for that purpose or out of such other funds as may be made available.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 604, § 13.